West Virginia, session 2026, SB772.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: §1. Finding and declaring certain claims against the Department of Education; Department of Health and Human Resources; Department of Health Facilities; Division of Corrections; Division of Highways; Division of Motor Vehicles; and West Virginia Army National Guard, to be moral obligations of the state and directing payment thereof. The Legislature has considered the findings of fact and recommendations reported to it by the Legislative Claims Commission concerning various claims against the state and agencies thereof and, in respect to each of the following claims, the Legislature adopts those findings of fact as its own and in respect of the claims herein, the Legislature has independently made findings of fact and determinations of award and hereby declares it to be the moral obligation of the state to pay each such claim in the amount specified below and directs the Auditor to issue warrants for the payment thereof out of any fund appropriated and available for the purpose.(a)	Claim against the Department of Education: (TO BE PAID FROM General REVENUE FUND) Sorenson	……………………$513.08 (b) 	Claim against the Department of Health and Human Resources: (TO BE PAID FROM General REVENUE FUND) FEI.com, Inc. dba FEI Systems.........................................................$34,403.81 (c)	Claim against Department of Health Facilities:(TO BE PAID FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND)(1)	Athena Consulting LLC…………………………………………….………..$571.98(d) 	Claim against the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation: (TO BE PAID FROM GeNERAL REVENUE FUND) John Michael Dignazio, Jr. $240.00 (e)	Claims against Department of Transportation, Division of Highways: (TO BE PAID FROM STATE ROAD FUND) Ra'ed J. Abdul-Hadi	$500.00Addie Adkins & Eric Hardman	$1,000.00David Arnold & Samantha Pillo	$475.94Holly Bailey on behalf of John Kennedy Bailey	$20,000.00Holly Bailey as Mother and Guardian of B. B., a minor child	$30,000.00Josh Bruce & Ashley Bruce	$250.00Burns Motor Freight, Inc. & Doug Burns	$9,000.00John Carter & Collision Appraisal Reinspection Service	$500.00Meghan Chill	$1,500.00Patrick Troy Clagett	$587.62Evelyn M. Clark	$5,000.00Tiffany Comer	$252.16Alexander Cruzzavala	$3,000.00Gary Davis & Lisa Davis	$500.00Russell Driskel, Administrator of the Estate of Raymond M. Driskel	$5,000.00Kaitlin Fields	$1,000.00Kala Ford & Alec Donaldson	$991.89Kathy S. Gibson	$274.42Brian Hawes	$1,620.00Hoffman Grain Farms LLC & Joe Hoffman	$5,000.00Kyara Keiffer	$82.00Deborah Klimek	$1,000.00Jacquelyn Klingshirn	$500.00David E. Kurp & Paula J. Kurp	$900.00Lori Leber	$621.01Michele Lemon	$337.00Charles W. Malone	$500.00Nicholas Marsh	$434.30Paul David Martin & Penny Lee Martin	$10,412.04Davien McCarty	$500.00Wesley McDonald	$24,328.41Maggie V. McDowell & Steven L. Buser	$28,750.00David F. Moore	$1,078.14Gary L. Morris & Shelley R. Morris	$12,000.00Craig W. Neal & Dorothy C. Neal	$449.56Valerie Nicholas-Littles	$2,000.00James A. Norman & Bobba P. Norman	$6,525.00William O'Neal & Regina O'Neal	$1,000.00Kimberly Page	$1,256.78Jake Parker	$158.17Essie P. Parsons	$472.59Jessica B. Perkins	$265.00Paul Phillips	$500.00Everett Randolph	$106.20David A. Rapp	$2,500.00Pierce D. Reesman	$174.13Charles R. Smith & Mary Wagner	$4,876.00Mason Scott Stark	$7,500.00Ethan Taylor & Chad Taylor	$1,000.00Stephanie Taylor	$1,000.00Jennifer Tucker	$1,000.00Edward Ross Tuckwiller, II	$688.58Richard L. Turley	$4,732.36Waldron S. Whitfield	$500.00Tabitha Young	$634.10Mary E. Youngblood	$172.12 (f) 	Claim against the Division of Motor Vehicles:(TO BE PAID FROM STATE ROAD FUND) Ensono, LLC	$49,407.70 (g)	Claims against WV Army National Guard	(TO BE PAID FROM GENERAL REVENUE FUND)(1)	Devon MD, LLC $32,561.20 DMD Medical Group Inc	  $92,365.00 The Legislature finds that the above moral obligations and the appropriations made in satisfaction thereof shall be the full compensation for all claimants and that prior to the payments to any claimant provided in this bill, the Legislative Claims Commission shall receive a release from said claimant releasing any and all claims for moral obligations arising from the matters considered by the Legislature in the finding of the moral obligations and the making of the appropriations for said claimant. The Legislative Claims Commission shall deliver all releases obtained from claimants to the department against which the claim was allowed.The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home